Oklahoma, session 2025, SB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 589, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 589. A. It shall be unlawful to willfully, knowingly,


and without probable cause make a false report to any person of any


crime or circumstances indicating the possibility of crime having


been committed, including the unlawful taking of personal property,


which report causes or encourages the exercise of police action or


investigation. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of


this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by


imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety (90) days


or by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by


both such fine and imprisonment if the false report accused a person

Req. No. 1350 Page 1


of a misdemeanor. Any person convicted of violating the provisions


of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony if the false report


accused a person of a felony. The punishments for such misdemeanor


or felony shall be the same as the provisions for such offense of


the accused crime in the false report.


B. It shall be unlawful to willfully, knowingly, and without


probable cause communicate false information concerning a missing


child to a law enforcement agency that causes or encourages the


activation of an AMBER alert warning system. Any person convicted


of violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a


felony punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more


than one (1) year or by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1350 TEK 12/30/2024 11:32:19 AM

















Req. No. 1350 Page 2